South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S353.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - State Board of Social Work Examiners, relating to Continuing Education Requirements, designated as Regulation Document Number 5301, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State Board of Social Work Examiners proposes to amend continuing education requirements for licensees of the Board to conform to Act 158 of the 2024 legislative session. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. ----XX----